Maryland, session 2025, HB0757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
– 1 –

Ch. 639 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4–411.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Barrel” means any measure of petroleum products or its by–products
which consists of 42.0 U.S. gallons of liquid measure.
(3) “Fund” means the Maryland Oil Disaster Containment, Clean–Up and
Contingency Fund.
(4) “Transfer” means the offloading or onloading of oil in the State from or
to any commercial vessel, barge, tank truck, tank car, pipeline, or any other means used
for transporting oil.
(b) A person other than a vessel or barge may not transfer oil in the State without
a license.
(c) (1) A license required under this section shall be secured from the
Department of the Environment subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this section.
(2) The fee on any barrel shall be imposed only once, at the point of first
transfer in the State.
(3) The license fee shall be:
(i) Credited to the Maryland Oil Disaster Containment, Clean–Up
and Contingency Fund and based on:
1. Before July 1, 2024, a 7.75 cents per barrel fee for oil
transferred in the State; [and]
2. On or after July 1, 2024, AND BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, a 5
cents per barrel fee for oil transferred in the State; and
3. ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025, A 9 CENTS PER BARREL
FEE FOR OIL TRANSFERRED IN THE STATE; AND
(ii) Until July 1, 2024, based on an additional 0.25 cent per barrel
fee for oil transferred in the State and credited to the Oil Contaminated Site Environmental
Cleanup Fund as described in Subtitle 7 of this title.
(4) (I) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL TRANSFER 4 CENTS OF THE AMOUNT COLLECTED FROM THE PER BARREL FEE
IN PARAGRAPH (3)(I)3 OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE PROFESSIONAL AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 639
VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER INNOVATIVE CANCER SCREENING TECHNOLOGIES
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–4002 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(II) FUNDS TRANSFERRED TO THE PROFESSIONAL AND
VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER INNOVATIVE CANCER SCREENING TECHNOLOGIES
PROGRAM UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–4006 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(4)] (5) (i) The license fee shall be paid quarterly to the Department
and on receipt by the Comptroller, credited to the proper fund.
(ii) The licensee shall certify to the Department, on forms as may be
prescribed by the Department, the number of barrels of oil transferred by the licensee
during the fee quarter no later than the last day of the month following the fee quarter.
(iii) These records shall be kept confidential by the Department.
[(5)] (6) (I) [When] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, the balance in the Maryland Oil Disaster Containment, Clean–Up
and Contingency Fund from the monthly license fees paid under paragraph (3)(i) of this
subsection into the Fund equals or exceeds a maximum limit of $5,000,000, collection of
subsequent monthly license fees under paragraph (3)(i) of this subsection shall be abated
until:
[(i)] 1. The balance in the Fund from the license fees becomes less
than or equal to $4,000,000; or
[(ii)] 2. There is evidence that the balance in the Fund could be
significantly reduced by the recent occurrence of a major discharge or series of discharges.
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026, THE FEE ABATEMENT
AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED 5
CENTS PER BARREL FOR OIL TRANSFERRED IN THE STATE.
[(6)] (7) (i) If a licensee fails to remit the fee and accompanying
certification required by this section, the amount of the license fee due shall be determined
by the Department from information as may be available.
(ii) Notice of this determination shall be given to the licensee liable
for payment of the license fee.
(iii) The determination shall finally and irrevocably fix the fee unless
the licensee against whom it is assessed, within 30 days after receiving notice of the
determination, shall apply to the Department for a hearing or unless the Department, on
its own, shall redetermine the fee.
– 3 –

Ch. 639 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(7)] (8) The Department shall promulgate rules and regulations,
establish audit procedures for the audit of licensees, and prescribe and publish forms as
may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.
Article – Health – General
13–4001.
In this subtitle, “Program” means the Professional and Volunteer Firefighter
Innovative Cancer Screening Technologies Program.
13–4006.
(a) (1) For fiscal years 2021 through 2024, the Governor shall include at least
$100,000 in the annual budget for the Program.
(2) For fiscal year 2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor may
include at least [$500,000] $3,000,000 $1,000,000 in the annual budget for the Program.
(b) Appropriations and expenditures made for the purpose of implementing the
Program, including the use of any funds received by a person under any component of the
Program, are subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided in § 2–1220 of
the State Government Article.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL USE THE FEES TRANSFERRED TO THE
PROGRAM UNDER § 4–411(C)(4) OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE EXCLUSIVELY FOR
THE PROGRAM.
(D) THE SECRETARY MAY USE UP TO 20% OF PROGRAM FUNDS TO SUPPORT
ACADEMIC MEDICAL RESEARCH CENTERS, INCLUDING THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR HEALTH COMPUTING, IN THE COLLECTION, ANALYSIS,
AND PROCESSING OF PROGRAM OUTCOME DATA FOR THE PURPOSES OF ASSESSING,
MAXIMIZING, AND IMPROVING THE EFFECTIVENESS AND CLINICAL UTILITY OF THE
CANCER SCREENING FUNDED BY THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –